Washington statutes.
RCW 19.285.900

Construction—2007 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 937).

The provisions of this chapter are to be liberally construed to effectuate the intent, policies, and purposes of this chapter.

[ 2007 c 1 s 9 (Initiative Measure No. 937, approved November 7, 2006).]